Florida, session 2026, HB1365.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
316.075, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
316.075 Traffic control signal devices.—
(1) Except for automatic warning signal lights installed
or to be installed at railroad crossings, whenever traffic,
including municipal traffic, is controlled by traffic control
signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted
arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the
colors green, red, and yellow shall be used, except for special
pedestrian signals carrying a word legend, and the lights shall
indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as
follows:
(c) Steady red indication.—
1. Vehicular traffic facing a steady red signal shall stop
before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1365-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1365 2026
intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection
and shall remain standing until a green indication is shown;
however:
a. The driver of a vehicle which is stopped at a clearly
marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on
the near side of the intersection, or, if none then at the point
nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of
approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering
the intersection in obedience to a steady red signal may make a
right turn, but shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and
other traffic proceeding as directed by the signal at the
intersection, except that municipal and county authorities may
prohibit any such right turn against a steady red signal at any
intersection, which prohibition shall be effective when a sign
giving notice thereof is erected in a location visible to
traffic approaching the intersection. Right turns under this
sub-subparagraph are prohibited at intersections using traffic
infraction detectors pursuant to ss. 316.0083 and 316.0776, and
a sign giving notice of such prohibition must be erected in a
location visible to traffic approaching the intersection.
b. The driver of a vehicle on a one-way street that
intersects another one-way street on which traffic moves to the
left shall stop in obedience to a steady red signal, but may
then make a left turn into the one-way street, but shall yield
the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic proceeding as
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1365-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1365 2026
directed by the signal at the intersection, except that
municipal and county authorities may prohibit any such left turn
as described, which prohibition shall be effective when a sign
giving notice thereof is attached to the traffic control signal
device at the intersection.
2.a. The driver of a vehicle facing a steady red signal
shall stop before entering the crosswalk and remain stopped to
allow a pedestrian, with a permitted signal, to cross a roadway
when the pedestrian is in the crosswalk or steps into the
crosswalk and is upon the half of the roadway upon which the
vehicle is traveling or when the pedestrian is approaching so
closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in
danger.
b. Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control
signal as provided in s. 316.0755, pedestrians facing a steady
red signal shall not enter the roadway.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1365-00